Massachusetts, session 194th, H3751.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 50 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 8, the word “and”.
SECTION 2. Section 50 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word "commonwealth", in the in line 10, the following words:-
“, and (5) rehabilitation and improvement of corridors on which regional economic
activity generates significant truck traffic.”
of 1